Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 3 ABATEMENT OF PUBLIC NUISANCE
16-13-307. Jurisdiction - venue - parties - process.

The several district courts of this state shall have original jurisdiction of proceedings under this part 3.

(1.5) No judgment of forfeiture of property in any forfeiture proceeding shall be entered unless and until an owner of the property is convicted of an offense listed in section 16-13-301 or 16-13-303, or a lesser included offense of an eligible offense if the conviction is the result of a negotiated guilty plea. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the conviction to be obtained in the same jurisdiction as the jurisdiction in which the forfeiture action is brought. In the event criminal charges arising from the same activity giving rise to the forfeiture proceedings are filed against any individual claiming an interest in the property subject to the forfeiture proceeding, the trial and discovery phases of the forfeiture proceeding shall be stayed by the court until the disposition of the criminal charges. A stay shall not be maintained during an appeal or post-conviction proceeding challenging a criminal conviction. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit or prevent the parties from contemporaneously resolving criminal charges and a forfeiture proceeding arising from the same activity.

(1.6) Upon acquittal or dismissal of a criminal action against a person named in a forfeiture action related to the criminal action, unless the forfeiture action was brought pursuant to one or more of paragraphs (a) to (f) of subsection (1.7) of this section, the forfeiture claim shall be dismissed and the seized property shall be returned as respects the subject matter property or interest therein of that person, if the case has been adjudicated as to all other claims, interests, and owners, unless possession of the property is illegal. If the forfeiture action is dismissed or judgment is entered in favor of the claimant, the claimant shall not be subject to any monetary charges by the state for storage of the property or expenses incurred in the preservation of the property, unless at the time of dismissal the plaintiff shows that those expenses would have been incurred to prevent waste of the property even if it had not been seized.

(1.7) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1.5) of this section:

A person shall lack standing for and shall be disallowed from pursuit of a claim or defense in a civil forfeiture action upon a finding that a warrant or other process has been issued for the apprehension of the person, and, in order to avoid criminal prosecution, the person:

Purposely leaves the state; or

Declines to enter or reenter the state to submit to its jurisdiction; or

Otherwise evades the jurisdiction of the court in which a criminal case is pending against the person or from which a warrant has been issued, by failing to appear in court or surrender on a warrant; and

Is not known to be confined or held in custody in any other jurisdiction within the United States for commission of criminal conduct in that jurisdiction.

If a person lacks standing pursuant to this paragraph (a), the forfeiture action may proceed and a judgment of forfeiture may be entered without a criminal conviction of an owner, upon motion and notice as provided in the rules of civil procedure.

If, following notice to all persons known to have an interest, or who have asserted an interest in the property subject to forfeiture, an owner fails to file an answer or other appropriate pleading with the court claiming an interest in the subject matter property, or no person establishes standing to contest the forfeiture action pursuant to section 16-13-303 (5), a forfeiture action may proceed and a judgment of forfeiture may be entered without a criminal conviction of an owner.

If the plaintiff proves by clear and convincing evidence that the property was instrumental in the commission of an offense listed in section 16-13-303 (1) or that the property is traceable proceeds of the offense or related criminal activity by a nonowner and the plaintiff proves by clear and convincing evidence that an owner is not an innocent owner pursuant to section 16-13-303 (5.2)(a), a judgment of forfeiture may be entered without a criminal conviction of an owner.

If an owner of the property who was involved in the public nuisance act or conduct giving rise to the claim of forfeiture subsequently dies, and was not an innocent owner pursuant to section 16-13-303 (5.2)(a), a judgment of forfeiture may be entered without a criminal conviction of an owner.

If an owner received a deferred judgment, deferred sentence, or participated in a diversion program, or in the case of a juvenile a deferred adjudication or deferred sentence or participated in a diversion program for the offense, a judgment of forfeiture may be entered without a criminal conviction.

A defendant or claimant shall be permitted to waive the requirement of a criminal conviction in order to settle a forfeiture action.

(1.8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the temporary seizure of property for evidentiary, investigatory, or protective purposes.

An action to abate a public nuisance shall be brought in the county in which the subject matter of the action, or some part thereof, is located or found or in the county where the public nuisance act, or any portion thereof, was committed.

(2.5) All forfeiture actions shall proceed in state district court if the property was seized by a local or state law enforcement agency as a result of an ongoing state criminal investigation and the owner is being prosecuted in state court. Unless directed by an authorized agent of the federal government, no state or local law enforcement agency may transfer any property seized by the state or local agency to a federal agency for forfeiture under federal law unless an owner of the property is being prosecuted in federal court.

Except as otherwise provided in this part 3, the practice and procedure in an action to abate a public nuisance shall be governed by the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

(3.5) An action brought pursuant to this part 3 regarding a class 1 public nuisance shall be filed within sixty-three days following the seizure of the property pursuant to section 16-13-315. The plaintiff may file the complaint after the expiration of sixty-three days from the date of seizure only if the complaint is accompanied by a written petition for late filing. Such petition for late filing shall demonstrate good cause for the late filing of the complaint. The sixty-three-day time limitation established by this subsection (3.5) shall not apply where the seizure of the property occurred pursuant to a warrant authorizing such seizure or otherwise under any statute or rule of criminal procedure, if the property is held as evidence in a pending criminal investigation or in a pending criminal case.

An action to abate a public nuisance may be brought by the district attorney, or the attorney general with the consent of the district attorney, in the name of the people of the state of Colorado or in the name of any officer, agency, county, or municipality of this state whose duties or functions include or relate to the subject matter of the action. Any action to abate a class 3 public nuisance as defined by section 16-13-305 (1)(f) may be brought only upon the request of the agency or officer issuing the order or under whose authority the order was issued when such order relates to unlawful pollution or contamination.

An action to abate a public nuisance, other than a class 4 public nuisance, and any action in which a temporary restraining order, temporary writ of injunction, or preliminary injunction is requested, shall be commenced by the filing of a complaint, which shall be verified or supported by affidavit. Summons shall be issued and served as in civil cases; except that a copy of the complaint and copies of any orders issued by the court at the time of filing shall be served with the summons.

During all discovery procedures in actions brought pursuant to this part 3, a witness or party may refuse to answer any question if said witness or party makes a good faith assertion that the disclosure would tend to identify, directly or indirectly, a confidential informant for a law enforcement agency, unless the district attorney intends to call said informant as a witness at any adversarial hearing. On a motion to compel discovery, no witness or party shall be sanctioned in any manner for withholding information pursuant to this subsection (6).

Actions to abate a public nuisance shall be heard by the court, without a jury, at all stages of the proceedings.

Repealed.

Part 2 of article 41 of title 38, C.R.S., shall not apply to any action under this part 3.

Continuance of the trial of a public nuisance action shall be granted upon stipulation of the parties or upon good cause shown.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 897, § 8, effective July 1, 2003.)

Public nuisance actions shall be included in the category of "expedited proceedings" specified in rules 16 and 26 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure; except that each party may conduct limited discovery as provided for in rule 26 (b)(2) of the Colorado rules of civil procedure. In addition, each party may move the court to authorize additional discovery upon good cause shown.

No claim for relief shall be asserted by any party other than the plaintiff in a public nuisance action; except that the defendant may make a request for the return of property seized pursuant to this part 3.

If a public nuisance trial pursuant to this part 3 results in an order to return subject personal property and the prosecution states an intent to appeal and proceeds to appeal that judgment or order, the court shall stay the judgment or order pending appeal, unless the court finds that the appeal was taken in bad faith or for the purpose of delay. No appeal bond shall be required, but the court may make appropriate orders to preserve the value of the property pending appeal.

Unknown persons who may claim an interest in the property, persons whose whereabouts are unknown despite a diligent good faith search, and persons upon whom the plaintiff has been unable to effect service as otherwise provided in the Colorado rules of civil procedure despite diligent good faith efforts may be served pursuant to a court order by publishing a copy of a summons twice in a newspaper of general circulation. The summons shall describe the property and state where the complaint and attendant documents may be obtained, and a party shall have thirty-five days after the last publication date to respond.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 262, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-307.

L. 87:

(2) and (4) amended and (6) to (13) added, p. 633, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(8) repealed, p. 988, § 14, effective April 24.

L. 92:

(3.5) added and (10) and (13) amended, p. 449, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(10)(a) amended and (10)(c) added, p. 1552, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1.5), (1.6), (1.7), (1.8), and (2.5) added, p. 919, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1.5), (1.6), (1.7), (10)(a), and (10)(b) amended, pp. 892, 897, §§ 4, 8, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(3.5) and (13) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 856, § 90, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the issuance of summons, see C.R.C.P. 4.

16-13-308. Temporary restraining order - preliminary injunction - when to issue.

If probable cause for the existence of a class 1 public nuisance is shown to the court by means of a complaint supported by an affidavit, the court shall issue a temporary restraining order to abate and prevent the continuance or recurrence of the nuisance or to secure property subject to forfeiture pursuant to this part 3. Such temporary restraining order shall:

Direct the sheriff or a peace officer to seize and, where applicable, close the public nuisance and keep the same effectually closed against its use for any purpose until further order of the court;

Direct the seizure or holding, if previously seized, of all personal property subject to the provisions of this part 3; and

Restrain and enjoin persons from selling, transferring, encumbering, damaging, destroying, or using as security for a bond any property subject to this part 3.

The temporary restraining order may make such provisions as the court finds reasonable for the maintenance, utilities, insurance, and security with respect to real property subject to a public nuisance temporary restraining order, including imposing those responsibilities on the owner or defendant, if said owner or defendant is allowed reasonable access to the property consistent with those limited purposes.

The court may order that all fixtures and contents of a public nuisance be stored on the premises of such public nuisance while an action under this part 3 is pending.

The court may require that documents evidencing title or registration or that keys to property subject to this part 3 be deposited with a sheriff or peace officer, to be kept in the constructive custody of the court, while an action under this part 3 is pending.

The court may require the sheriff or peace officer executing the order to post a copy of the order on property subject to the order.

Any person with an ownership interest adversely affected by a temporary restraining order issued pursuant to this subsection (1) may file a motion to vacate the temporary restraining order. Such motion shall be filed within fourteen days of the time said person is served with or otherwise has notice of the temporary restraining order. The motion shall be set for hearing within fourteen days after its filing. At said hearing, the court shall determine whether the various provisions of the temporary restraining order should remain in effect pending final determination of the action. No part of the temporary restraining order shall be vacated unless the proponent of the motion demonstrates that there is no probable cause to believe that a public nuisance exists or that the public nuisance acts underlying the action occurred, or that the proponent has a reasonable likelihood of prevailing on the merits of the case with respect to the temporary seizure or closure of the property. No issue regarding the forfeiture of the property shall be raised at the hearing on the motion, except the court may consider an innocent owner defense pursuant to section 16-13-303 (5.2) by a proponent who has not been charged in a parallel criminal action arising from the same activity giving rise to the forfeiture proceedings. When the innocent owner defense is raised as grounds for vacating the order, the issues at the hearing shall be limited to modifying the order to provide for the use of the property during the pendency of the action by an innocent owner, but only if such use is consistent with preserving it for forfeiture as to any other interest. Such a modifying order may include, without limitation, reasonable provisions for the continued occupancy of a residence, or the operation of a business and the sale or disposition of business inventory. However, no such modifying order shall include the release of currency. The determination of the facts by the court at the hearing is independent of and shall not be considered in the determination of the same or similar facts in the adjudication of any criminal charges arising out of the same occurrences. Any motion to vacate a temporary restraining order shall state specifically the factual and legal grounds upon which it is based, and only those grounds may be considered at the hearing. Until vacated, the temporary restraining order shall remain in full force and effect.

In an action to abate a class 2 public nuisance, the court may, as a part of a preliminary injunction, direct the sheriff to seize and close such public nuisance and to keep the same effectually closed against its use for any purpose, until further order of the court. While the preliminary injunction remains in effect, the building or place seized and closed, and all personal property seized thereunder, shall be subject to the orders of the court.

Temporary restraining orders and preliminary injunctions for public nuisances other than class 1 public nuisances may be issued as provided by the Colorado rules of civil procedure. No bond or security shall be required of the district attorney or the people of the state in any action to abate a public nuisance.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 262, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-308.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 956, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 684, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) and (3) R&RE, p. 635, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(f) amended, p. 1097, § 15, effective May 31.

L. 2002:

(1)(f) amended, p. 920, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(f) amended, p. 891, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1)(f) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 856, § 91, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For preliminary injunctions, see C.R.C.P. 65(a).

16-13-309. Judgment - relief.

The judgment in an action to abate a public nuisance may include a permanent injunction to restrain, abate, and prevent the continuance or recurrence of the nuisance and an order directing the confiscation and forfeiture of property. The court may grant declaratory relief, mandatory orders, or any other relief deemed necessary to accomplish the purposes of the injunction or order and enforce the same, and the court may retain jurisdiction of the case for the purpose of enforcing its orders.

If the existence of a class 1 public nuisance is established in an action authorized by this part 3, an order of abatement shall be entered as a part of the judgment in the case, which order shall direct the removal from the building, place, vehicle, or real property and the forfeiture of all fixtures and contents thereof and the confiscation and forfeiture of all personal property, including vehicles, seized or subject to seizure as provided in section 16-13-303 and shall direct the sale of the personal property, including vehicles, as provided in this part 3. If the building, place, or real property is not forfeited pursuant to this part 3, the order shall direct the effectual closing of such property against its use for any purpose for a period of one year, unless sooner released by the court pursuant to the provisions of this part 3. While the order remains in effect as to closing, such building, place, or real property shall remain in the custody of the court. The court shall cause a copy of the order of abatement to be recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the property is located.

The judgment in an action to abate a class 2 public nuisance may include an order directing the sheriff to seize and close the public nuisance, and to keep the same effectually closed until further order of the court, not to exceed one year.

The judgment in an action to abate a class 3 public nuisance may include, in addition to or in the alternative to other injunctive relief, an order requiring the removal, correction, or other abatement of a public nuisance, in whole or in part, by the sheriff, at the expense of the owner or operator of the public nuisance.

The judgment in an action to abate a public nuisance may include, in addition to or in the alternative to any other relief authorized by the provisions of this part 3, the imposition of a fine, within the limits provided in section 16-13-312, conditioned upon failure or refusal of compliance with the orders of the court within any time limits therein fixed.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 263, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-309.

L. 81:

(2) amended, p. 956, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 684, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 636, § 7, effective July 1.

16-13-310. Redelivery of seized premises.

If the owner of a building, a place, or any real property seized and closed as a class 1 public nuisance has not been guilty of any contempt of court in the proceedings, and appears and pays all costs, fees, and allowances which are declared by this section to be a lien on the building, place, or real property, and files a bond in the amount fixed by the court not to exceed the full value of said property, with sureties to be approved by the court, conditioned that he will immediately abate any such nuisance that exists at the building, place, or real property and prevent the same from being established or kept thereat within a period of one year thereafter, the court, if satisfied of his good faith and satisfied that such owner had not conducted, used, maintained, or knowingly permitted the conducting, using, or maintaining of such public nuisance, may order the building, place, or real property to be delivered to said owner and the order of abatement canceled so far as the same relates to said property. If any property is found not to be a public nuisance pursuant to this part 3 or if said property fits the description of property specified in section 16-13-303 (2) and (3) and the property is not subject to forfeiture or an affirmative defense has been proven, said property shall be released to the owner without conditions. The release of the property under the provisions of this section shall not release it from any judgment, lien, penalty, or liability to which it is subject by law.

If the owner or operator of a building or place seized and closed as a class 2 public nuisance has not been guilty of any contempt of court in the proceedings, and demonstrates by evidence satisfactory to the court that the public nuisance has been abated and will not recur, the court may order the premises delivered to the owner or operator. As a condition of such order, the court may require the posting of bond, in an amount fixed by the court, for the faithful performance of the obligation of the owner or operator thereunder to prevent recurrence or continuance of the public nuisance.

If the tenant or occupant, other than the owner, of a building, a place, or any real property is involved in conducting or maintaining a public nuisance, the owner need not be made a party to the action until the tenant or occupant is evicted or the district attorney seeks to enforce the remedies of this part 3 against the owner. However, the owner may intervene in the action at any time.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 263, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-310.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 957, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 684, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended and (3) added, p. 636, § 8, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1586, § 57, effective July 1.

16-13-311. Disposition of seized personal property.

Any personal property subject to seizure, confiscation, forfeiture, or destruction under the provisions of this part 3, and which is seized as a part of or incident to proceedings under this part 3 for which disposition is not provided by another statute of this state, shall be disposed of as provided in this section.

Any such property which is required by law to be destroyed, or the possession of which is illegal, or which in the opinion of the court is not properly the subject of a sale may be destroyed pursuant to a warrant for the destruction of personal property issued by the court and directed to the sheriff of the proper county or any peace officer and returned by the sheriff or peace officer after execution thereof. The court shall stay the execution of any such warrant during the period in which the property is used as evidence in any pending criminal or civil proceeding.

If the prosecution prevails in the forfeiture action, the court shall order the property forfeited. Such order perfects the state's right and interest in and title to such property and relates back to the date when title to the property vested in the state pursuant to section

16-13-316

. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3)(c) of this section, the court shall also order such property to be sold at a public sale by the law enforcement agency in possession of the property in the manner provided for sales on execution, or in another commercially reasonable manner. Property forfeited pursuant to this section or proceeds therefrom must be distributed or applied in the following order:

To payment of the balances due on any liens perfected on or before the date of seizure preserved by the court in the forfeiture proceedings, in the order of their priority;

To compensate an innocent partial owner for the fair market value of his or her interest in the property;

To any person who suffers bodily injury, property damage, or property loss as a result of the conduct constituting a public nuisance that resulted in such forfeiture, if said person petitions the court therefor prior to the hearing dividing the proceeds pursuant to this section and the court finds that such person suffered said damages as a result of the subject acts that resulted in the forfeiture;

To the law enforcement agency in possession of the property for reasonable fees and costs of sale, maintenance, and storage of the property;

To the district attorney for actual and reasonable expenses related to the costs of prosecuting the forfeiture proceeding and title transfer not to exceed ten percent of the value of the property;

One percent of the value of the property to the clerk of the court for administrative costs associated with compliance with this section;

The balance must be delivered, upon order of the court, as follows:

Fifty percent to the general fund of the governmental body or bodies with budgetary authority over the seizing agency for public safety purposes or, if the seizing agency was a multijurisdictional task force, fifty percent to be distributed in accordance with the appropriate intergovernmental agreement;

Twenty-five percent to the behavioral health administrative services organization contracting with the office of behavioral health in the department of human services serving the judicial district where the forfeiture proceeding was prosecuted to fund detoxification and substance use disorder treatment. Money appropriated to the behavioral health administrative services organization must be in addition to, and not be used to supplant, other funding appropriated to the office of behavioral health; and

Twenty-five percent to the law enforcement community services grant program fund, created pursuant to section

24-32-124 (5)

.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 921, § 5, effective July 1, 2002.)

If, in a forfeiture proceeding, a partial owner is determined to be an innocent owner under law, at the option of the innocent partial owner, in lieu of a public sale, the innocent partial owner may purchase the forfeited items from the state at a private sale for fair market value. Proceeds received by the state shall be disposed of pursuant to this section.

After a judgment of forfeiture has been entered, any seizing agency in possession of any money forfeited shall deposit the money in the registry of the court where the forfeiture order was entered. Upon the sale of forfeited real or personal property, the seizing agency responsible for overseeing the sale shall ensure that any lienholders are compensated from the proceeds of the sale pursuant to the priorities specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) for their interests in the forfeited property. The seizing agency shall deposit all remaining proceeds from the sale in the registry of the court immediately upon completion of the sale. The seizing agency shall notify the court and the district attorney when all property subject to the forfeiture order has been sold and all proceeds and money have been deposited in the registry of the court where the forfeiture order was entered.

Within thirty-five days after the date the order of forfeiture is entered, the district attorney may submit a motion, an affidavit, and any supporting documentation to the court to request compensation consistent with this section. Within thirty-five days after the date the order of forfeiture is entered, any victim of the criminal act giving rise to the forfeiture may submit a request for compensation, an affidavit, and supporting documentation to the district attorney to request compensation from the forfeiture proceeds.

Within fourteen days after the date a seizing agency notifies the court that all property forfeited has been sold and all proceeds and money have been deposited in the registry of the court where the forfeiture order was entered, the seizing agency may submit a motion, an affidavit, and supporting documentation to the court for reimbursement of expenses consistent with this section. In its motion, the seizing agency shall identify any other seizing agencies that participated in the seizure and specify the details of any intergovernmental agreement regarding sharing of proceeds. The seizing agency shall send a copy of this motion to the district attorney.

The district attorney shall prepare a motion and proposed order for distribution based upon the motions and requests submitted by the parties. The order shall include allocation of one percent of the value of the property to the clerk of the court for the direct and indirect costs incurred by the clerk in implementing the provisions of this subsection (3). The district attorney shall send copies to all remaining interested parties.

Any party shall have fourteen days after filing of the proposed order to file any objections to the proposed order filed by the district attorney.

(3.5) Instead of liens and encumbrances on real property being satisfied from the proceeds of sale, real property may be sold subject to all liens or encumbrances on record. The purchase of the property by the successful bidder under this subsection (3.5) shall be conditioned on the bidder satisfying and obtaining the release of the first and second priority liens within sixty-three days after the sale, or obtaining written authorization from those lien holders for the bidder to receive the sheriff's deed which shall be issued after such satisfaction or authorization. The purchaser of the property shall take title free of any lien, encumbrance, or cloud on the title recorded after title vests in the state pursuant to section

16-13-316

.

It is the intent of the general assembly that moneys allocated to a seizing agency pursuant to subsection (3) of this section shall not be considered a source of revenue to meet normal operating needs.

If more than one seizing agency was substantially involved in effecting the forfeiture, the agencies shall enter into a stipulation with regard to costs incurred by the agencies and the percentage of any remaining proceeds to be deposited for the benefit of the agencies or any property to be directly forfeited for use of such agencies. Upon the filing by such agencies of such stipulation with the court, the court shall order the proceeds or property so distributed. If the agencies are unable to reach an agreement, the court shall take testimony and equitably distribute the proceeds.

The state shall issue a certificate of title for a vehicle to the purchaser or seizing agency if said vehicle is acquired pursuant to this part 3.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 264, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-311.

L. 81:

(3) amended, p. 957, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(2) and (3)(b) amended and (4) to (6) added, p. 637, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 921, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

IP(3)(a) amended and (3.5) added, p. 904, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(3)(a)(VII)(B) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1155, § 26, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(3)(e), (3)(f), (3)(h), and (3.5) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 857, § 92, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

IP(3)(a) and (3)(a)(VII)(B) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1252, § 9, effective May 25.

L. 2018:

IP(3)(a) and (3)(a)(VII) amended, (HB 18-1020), ch. 307, p. 1860, § 4, effective September 1.

L. 2022:

(3)(a)(VII)(B) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1596, § 241, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Section 263(3) of chapter 222 (HB 22-1278), Session Laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act changing this section takes effect only if HB 22-1256 becomes law and takes effect July 1, 2022, or on the effective date of HB 22-1256, whichever is later. HB 22-1256 became law and took effect August 10, 2022.

Cross references:

(1) For provisions on reporting and disposition of forfeited property, see part 7 of this article 13.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

16-13-312. Violation of injunction.

Any violation or disobedience of any injunction or order issued by the court in an action to abate a public nuisance shall be punished as a contempt of court by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars nor more than two thousand dollars; but the court may treat each day on which the violation or disobedience of an injunction or order continues or recurs as a separate contempt and may impose a fine, in addition to the fine provided in this section, in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars per day.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 264, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-312.

16-13-313. Fees - costs and fines - lien and collection.

For removing and selling personal property as provided in this part 3, the sheriff shall be entitled to charge and receive the same fees as he would for levying upon and selling like property on execution.

For seizing and closing any building, premises, or vehicle as provided in this part 3, or for performing other duties pursuant to the direction of the court pursuant to the provisions of this part 3, the sheriff shall be entitled to a reasonable sum fixed by the court, in addition to the actual costs incurred or expended.

All fees and costs allowed by the provisions of this section, the costs of court action to abate any public nuisance, and all fines levied by the court in contempt proceedings incident to an action to abate a public nuisance shall be a first and prior lien upon any real or personal property seized under the provisions of this part 3, and the same shall be enforceable and collectible by execution issued by order of the court, from the property of any person liable therefor.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 265, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-313.

L. 81:

(2) amended, p. 958, § 8, effective July 1.

16-13-314. Disposition of forfeited real property.

In an action to abate a class 1 public nuisance, if the court finds that such class 1 public nuisance exists and that the same has been conducted, used, or maintained by the owner of a building, place, or any real property seized and closed as a class 1 public nuisance, or that the nuisance has been conducted, used, or maintained by any person with the actual knowledge and consent of the owner, a permanent order of abatement shall be entered as a part of the judgment in the case. The order of abatement shall direct the sheriff to sell such building or place and the ground upon which such building or place is situate or any other real property, to the extent of the interest of such owner therein, at public sale in the manner provided for sales of property upon execution. In no event shall real property that is neither proceeds of nor part of the same lot or tract of land used for the public nuisance act that was the underlying subject matter of the public nuisance action, be subject to seizure and forfeiture, excepting access and egress routes.

The proceeds of such sale shall be applied in the same manner and priority as enumerated in section 16-13-311 (3).

It is the intent of the general assembly that moneys allocated to a seizing agency pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall not be considered a source of revenue to meet normal operating needs.

If more than one seizing agency was substantially involved in effecting the forfeiture, the agencies shall enter into a stipulation with regard to costs incurred by the agencies and the percentage of any remaining proceeds to be deposited for the benefit of the agencies. Upon the filing by such agencies of such stipulation with the court, the court shall order the proceeds so distributed. If the agencies are unable to reach an agreement, the court shall take testimony and equitably distribute the proceeds.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 265, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-314.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 958, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 685, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(3) and (4) added, p. 638, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 798, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 923, § 6, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For provisions on reporting and disposition of forfeited property, see part 7 of this article 13.

16-13-315. Seizure of personal property.

Any personal property subject to seizure, confiscation, or forfeiture under the provisions of this part 3 may be seized:

Pursuant to any writ, order, or injunction issued under the provisions of this part 3; or

Under the authority of a search warrant; or

By any peace officer or agent of a seizing agency with probable cause to believe that such property is a public nuisance or otherwise subject to confiscation and forfeiture under this part 3 if the seizure is incident to a lawful search or arrest.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit or forbid the seizure of any such personal property in any manner now or hereafter required, authorized, or permitted by law.

If a rental motor vehicle is seized pursuant to this part 3, the seizing agency shall notify the motor vehicle rental company of the seizure if the motor vehicle is identified as a rental motor vehicle. The motor vehicle rental company may appear at the seizing agency and request the return of the rental motor vehicle. The rental motor vehicle shall be returned to the motor vehicle rental company unless the motor vehicle must be maintained in the custody of the seizing agency for evidentiary purposes or if the seizing agency has probable cause to believe the motor vehicle rental company, at the time of rental, had knowledge or notice of the criminal activity for which the rental car was used.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 265, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-315.

L. 87:

(1)(b) amended and (1)(c) added, p. 638, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(3) added, p. 924, § 7, effective July 1.